Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB487.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 520 of Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 520. Supplies manufactured and services performed by persons with disabilities.(a) General rule.--(1) Contracts for supplies manufactured by and services performed by persons with disabilities shall be entered into in accordance with this section without the requirement for competitive bidding. The following apply:(i) Persons with disabilities must make an appreciable contribution in manufacturing [an item] a supply or performing a service.123456789101112131415161718 (ii) The department shall determine whether the contribution by persons with disabilities is an appreciable contribution.(2) When the Commonwealth enters into a contract under this section with a cost exceeding $300,000 per year, the department, in cooperation with the purchasing agency, shall conduct an annual review to confirm compliance with the contract and the requirements of this section. The annual review shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment of all requirements related to appreciable contribution. If the department, in cooperation with the purchasing agency, determines that persons with disabilities are not making an appreciable contribution in the manufacturing of [an item] a supply or the performance of a service or an agency for persons with disabilities is not in compliance with other requirements of this section, the department shall give an agency for persons with disabilities 45 days in which to remedy the deficiency. If the agency for persons with disabilities fails to remedy the deficiency within 45 days, the agency for persons with disabilities shall be deemed to be in noncompliance with the contract, and the purchasing agency may terminate the contract and seek to procure the [item] supply or service through a competitive bidding process. Nothing in this section shall preclude a purchasing agency from procuring [an item] a supply or service through an emergency contract when an agency for persons with disabilities is deemed to be in noncompliance.(3) The following apply to s ubminimum wage: (i) Beginning on the effective date of this subparagraph, the department is prohibited from entering 20250HB0487PN0471 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 into any new contract that utilizes a Federal 14(c) certificate for work connected to this section.(ii) Beginning t wo years following the effective date of this subparagraph, the use of a Federal 14(c) certificate for work connected to this section is prohibited.(4) The following apply to integration:(i) Beginning two years following the effective date of this subparagraph, an agency for persons with disabilities shall have a work environment that is integrated for employees connected to State contracts described in this section.(ii) In determining whether a location is integrated, employees who are persons with disabilities must interact with other individuals who are not persons with disabilities at the work location. The interaction:(A) Shall not apply to supervisors, job coaches and service providers.(B) Shall involve coworkers, customers, vendors and members of the general public.(iii) For purposes of this section, an agency for persons with disabilities may be an organization that affirmatively hires and promotes persons with disabilities, if the agency for persons with disabilities meets the integration requirement and other eligibility requirements under this section.(iv) The department shall require an attestation from each agency for persons with disabilities specifying that applicable locations are integrated in accordance with this paragraph.20250HB0487PN0471 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The department shall monitor compliance with the integration requirement under this paragraph by a participating agency for persons with disabilities through the annual review in accordance with paragraph (2), which shall also include a location site visit to the agency for persons with disabilities:(A) no less frequently than every five years; or(B) upon receipt of a credible allegation that the participating agency for persons with disabilities is in material violation of the integration requirement.(vi) The department may delegate the duty to monitor compliance under subparagraph (v) through an interagency agreement to the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation or another State department or agency.(5) Each agency for persons with disabilities shall prioritize disability inclusion and representation regarding employment strategic planning.(b) Fair market price.--Upon request to the department and notice to the purchasing agency, the department shall determine the fair market price of any supply manufactured by or service performed by persons with disabilities and offered for sale to any Commonwealth agency by an agency for persons with disabilities. The department shall revise the prices in accordance with changing market conditions.(c) Distribution.--[At the request of the department, the Department of Public Welfare or a nonprofit agency with the approval of the Department of Public Welfare] The department, or a nonprofit agency at the request of and with the approval of the department, shall facilitate the distribution of orders for 20250HB0487PN0471 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supplies manufactured by or services performed by persons with disabilities among agencies for persons with disabilities.(d) Procurement of supplies manufactured and services performed by persons with disabilities.--Except as provided in subsection (e), all supplies manufactured by and services furnished by persons with disabilities shall be procured in accordance with applicable specifications of the department or other Commonwealth agencies from any agency for persons with disabilities whenever the supplies and services are available at a price determined by the department to be the fair market price. The head of a purchasing agency shall annually discuss its needs for supplies or services with any agency for persons with disabilities.(e) Procurement from Commonwealth agency.--If any supply manufactured by or any service performed by persons with disabilities and offered for sale is available for procurement from any Commonwealth agency and this part or any other statute requires the procurement of the supply or service from the Commonwealth agency, then the procurement of the supply or service shall be made in accordance with the other provisions.(f) [Exception] Exceptions.--(1) Notwithstanding [subsection (h)] any other provisions of this section, when the Commonwealth enters into a contract under this section for the operation of the Commonwealth's driver's license photo centers, at least 70% of the amount paid by the Commonwealth shall be used to cover payment of wages and salaries to persons with disabilities and to cover actual manufacturing costs, real estate lease costs, property insurance and other costs which are specifically required by contract.20250HB0487PN0471 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department may provide an exception to ratio or integration requirements due to unexpected external events outside of the control of the agency for persons with disabilities, for the purposes of piloting new employment initiatives, or other reasons to protect or advance competitive, integrated employment for persons with disabilities for the purposes of this section.(g) Application.--(1) This section shall not supersede any contract currently in force between a Commonwealth agency and another party.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as conferring upon any party any right or interest in any contract entered into with the Commonwealth.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Agency for persons with disabilities." Any charitable, nonprofit agency incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth and approved by the department through which persons with disabilities manufacture supplies or perform services in this Commonwealth.["Appreciable contribution."(1) In addition to paragraph (2), the department shall determine whether the contribution by individuals with disabilities is appreciable. Persons with disabilities must make an appreciable contribution in manufacturing a supply or performing a service.(2) At least 75% of the personnel either engaged in the direct labor of manufacturing of a supply or engaged in the 20250HB0487PN0471 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direct labor in performing a service in this Commonwealth must be visually impaired, mentally retarded or physically disabled. In addition, at least 75% of the amount paid by the Commonwealth agency for the supply or the service shall be remitted to the agency for persons with disabilities to cover payment of wages and salaries to persons with disabilities and to cover other actual manufacturing costs incurred by the agency for persons with disabilities in manufacturing of a supply.]"Appreciable contribution." A contribution that satisfies the direct labor ratio requirements."Direct labor ratio requirements." As follows:(1) At least 51% of the direct labor involved in manufacturing a supply or engaged in performing a service in this Commonwealth involves persons with disabilities.(2) At least 51% of the amount paid by the Commonwealth agency for the supply or the service is remitted to the agency for persons with disabilities to cover payment of wages and salaries to persons with disabilities and to cover other actual allowable overhead costs incurred by the agency for persons with disabilities in manufacturing the supply or delivering the service."Federal 14(c) certificate." A subminimum wage certificate provided in accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 214(c) (relating to employment under special certificates)."Manufactured." The transformation of raw materials or the assembly of essential component parts or a combination of both in the production of a supply which is different in form, composition or character from the raw materials or the essential component parts. This definition applies only to the assembly of 20250HB0487PN0471 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a supply.["Mentally retarded." Subaverage general intellectual functioning which originates during the developmental period and is associated with the impairment of maturation, learning or social adjustment.]"Performed." Labor provided to do the work to fulfill the requirements of the contract.["Persons with a disability." A person who is visually impaired, mentally retarded or physically disabled."Physically disabled." A limitation of most activities and functioning by virtue of a severe impairment of the various bodily systems which cannot be eliminated, modified or substantially reduced by the usual rehabilitation services and which precludes competitive employment.]"Persons with disabilities." Individuals with a physical or mental impairment that presents a substantial impediment to employment."Services." While "services" is defined in section 103 (relating to definitions), for the purposes of this section, the term specifically includes such packaging or repackaging which, as determined by the department, provides a substantial and real benefit to the Commonwealth agency which needs the supplies to be packaged or repackaged. When packaging or repackaging services are to be provided to a Commonwealth agency by an agency for persons with disabilities, the Commonwealth agency shall make the arrangements for the procurement of the supplies to be packaged or repackaged. Packaging or repackaging shall not be considered "services" if the manufacturer usually packages or repackages the supplies in the quantity required by the agency as a part of its manufacturing and distribution process. This 20250HB0487PN0471 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definition applies only to the packaging or repackaging of a supply.["Visually impaired." A condition in which central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lenses or in which the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees.]Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0487PN0471 - 9 - 1234567